Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-302
Roads; sprinkler irrigation system; restrictions; violations; penalty.

A sprinkler irrigation system which due to location or design diverts, or is capable of diverting, water onto or across a public road so as to saturate, wash, or impair the maintenance, construction, or passability of such public road or allows water to accumulate on the roadway or traveled surface of the public road shall be equipped with a device which will automatically shut off the endgun of the irrigation system causing such diversion or accumulation of water. Any person who fails to comply with this section shall, upon conviction thereof, be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor, except that section 39-301 shall be controlling with respect to mechanical malfunctions and normal weather conditions.

Laws 1981, LB 24, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-703.01;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 26.